Massachusetts, session 194th, H424.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 48 of Chapter 93 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following subsection:-
L. This section shall not apply to a transaction for the sale of a new or used motor vehicle
by a seller holding a Class 1 license pursuant to section 59 of chapter 140 in which the buyer
signs by electronic means away from the seller’s place of business a written contract regarding
the sale of a motor vehicle; provided, however, the seller shall give written notice at time of sale
to the buyer that this section does not apply
of 1